Washington statutes.
RCW 2.76.800

Recommendations to legislature. (Expires January 1, 2026.)

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1219.SL) ***

The interbranch advisory committee shall submit a recommendation to the legislative committees having jurisdiction over general civil or criminal law matters and having jurisdiction over the state operating budget by November 1, 2024, on whether the committee should be legislatively renewed or changed in any way.

[ 2022 c 284 s 4.]